Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.131

Director of traffic violations.

There shall be a director of the traffic violations bureau or such similar agency of the city as may be created by ordinance of said city. Said director shall be appointed by the judges of the municipal court subject to such civil service laws and rules as may be provided in such city. Said director shall act under the supervision of the court administrator of the municipal court and shall be responsible for the supervision of the traffic violations bureau or similar agency of the city. Upon *this 1969 amendatory act becoming effective those employees connected with the traffic violations bureau under civil service status shall be continued in such employment and such classification. Before entering upon the duties of his or her office said director shall take and subscribe an oath the same as required for officers of the city and shall execute a penal bond in such sum and with such sureties as the legislative body of the city may direct and subject to their approval, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties, and that he or she will faithfully account to and pay over to the treasurer of said city all moneys belonging to the city which shall come into his or her hands as such director. Said director shall be paid such compensation as the legislative body of the city may deem reasonable.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2035; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this 1969 amendatory act" [1969 ex.s. c 147] became effective August 11, 1969.